North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Meetings and Action Without Meetings.

§ 55A-7-01.
Annual and regular meetings.

A corporation having members with the right to vote for directors shall hold a meeting of the members annually.

A corporation with members may hold regular membership meetings at the times stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

Annual and regular membership meetings may be held (i) in person in or out of this State at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws or (ii) by means of remote communication, as provided in

G.S. 55A-7-09

. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, in-person annual and regular meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

At annual and regular meetings, the members shall consider and act upon such matters as may be raised consistent with the notice requirements of

G.S. 55A-7-05

and G.S. 55A-7-22(d).

The failure to hold an annual or regular meeting at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(f).

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (a) requires a corporation having members that have a right to vote for directors to have a meeting of members annually. Former G.S. 55A-30 required annual meetings if there were members, whether or not members had a right to vote for directors.

§ 55A-7-02.
Special meeting.

A corporation with members shall hold a special meeting of members in any of the following circumstances:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Within 30 days after the holders of at least ten percent (10%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation’s secretary one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

If not otherwise fixed under

G.S. 55A-7-03

or

G.S. 55A-7-07

, the record date for determining members entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first member signs the demand.

Special meetings of members may be held (i) in person in or out of this State at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws or (ii) by means of remote communication as provided in

G.S. 55A-7-09

. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, in-person special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only those matters that are within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by

G.S. 55A-7-05

may be acted upon at a special meeting of members.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(g).

North Carolina Commentary

This section changes prior law in that (1) the president is not statutorily authorized to call special members’ meetings as under prior law and must now be given that authority by the articles of incorporation or bylaws and (2) formerly, members holding 5% of the votes could call a special meeting in the absence of a provision fixing a different number or percentage, whereas under this section, 10% of the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered is required and this percentage cannot be modified by the corporation. Subsection (b) had no counterpart in the prior law.

§ 55A-7-03.
Court-ordered meeting.

The superior court of the county where a corporation’s principal office, or, if there is none in this State, its registered office, is located may, after notice is given to the corporation and upon such further notice and opportunity to be heard, if any, as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances, summarily order a meeting to be held in any of the following circumstances:

On application of any member if an annual meeting was not held within 15 months after the corporation’s last annual meeting.

On application of a member who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under

G.S. 55A-7-02

, if the corporation has not held the meeting as required by that section.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, specify a record date for determining those persons entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting. The court may order that the meeting be held by means of remote communication as provided in

G.S. 55A-7-09

.

If the court orders a meeting, it may also order the corporation to pay all or part of the member’s costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred to obtain the order.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(h).

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

§ 55A-7-04.
Action by written consent.

Action required or permitted by this Chapter to be taken at a meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members entitled to vote on the action. The action shall be evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken, signed before or after such action by all members entitled to vote on the action, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records. Except as limited by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a member’s consent to action taken without a meeting may be in electronic form and delivered by electronic means.

If not otherwise determined under

G.S. 55A-7-03

or

G.S. 55A-7-07

, the record date for determining members entitled to take action without a meeting is the date the first member signs the consent under subsection (a) of this section.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

History.

1977, c. 193, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2008-37, s. 4; 2021-162, s. 2(i).

§ 55A-7-05.
Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall give notice of meetings of members by any means that is fair and reasonable and consistent with its bylaws.

Any notice that conforms to the requirements of subsection (c) is fair and reasonable, but other means of giving notice may also be fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are considered; provided, however, that notice of matters referred to in subdivision (c)(2) of this section shall be given as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

Notice is fair and reasonable if it conforms to all of the following:

The corporation gives notice to all members entitled to vote at the meeting of the place, if any, date, and time of each annual, regular, and special meeting of members no fewer than 10, or, if notice is mailed by other than first class, registered or certified mail, no fewer than 30, nor more than 60 days before the meeting date.

(1a)

If the meeting will be held by means of remote communication, the notice shall include all the information required by

G.S. 55A-7-09

.

Notice of an annual or regular meeting includes a description of any matter or matters that shall be approved by the members under

G.S. 55A-8-31

, 55A-8-55, 55A-10-03, 55A-10-21, 55A-11-04, 55A-12-02, or 55A-14-02.

Notice of special meeting includes a description of the matter or matters for which the meeting is called.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual, regular, or special meeting of members is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place, if the new date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If the meeting is to be continued by means of remote communication, the announcement shall also include a description of the means of remote communication. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under

G.S. 55A-7-07

, however, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given under this section to the members of record entitled to vote at the meeting as of the new record date.

When giving notice of an annual, regular, or special meeting of members, a corporation shall give notice of a matter a member intends to raise at the meeting if all of the following apply:

The corporation is requested in writing to do so by a person or persons entitled to call a special meeting pursuant to

G.S. 55A-7-02

.

The request is received by the secretary or president of the corporation at least 10 days before the corporation gives notice of the meeting.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(j).

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (a) is a departure from prior law and recognizes that the traditional written notice to each member by personal delivery or mail may be burdensome in certain cases. Thus, notice may be given by any means that is consistent with the bylaws and that is “fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are considered.” Relevant circumstances include the purpose of the meeting and the nature and size of the corporation.

Subsection (c) establishes a “safe harbor” for what is fair and reasonable notice, but subsection (b) provides that the safe harbor is not mandatory except with respect to matters referred to in subdivision (c)(2).

§ 55A-7-06.
Waiver of notice.

A member may waive any notice required by this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed by the member entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A member’s attendance at a meeting in person or by means of remote communication waives objection to all of the following:

Lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or conducting business at the meeting.

Consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the member objects to considering the matter before it is voted upon in an in-person meeting.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(k).

§ 55A-7-07.
Record date.

The bylaws of a corporation may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to notice of a members’ meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors may fix a future date as the record date. If no record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which notice is given are entitled to notice of the meeting.

The bylaws of a corporation may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to vote at a members’ meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors may fix a future date as the record date. If no record date is fixed, members on the date of the meeting who are otherwise eligible to vote are entitled to vote at the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner for determining a date as the record date for the purpose of determining the members entitled to any rights in respect of any other lawful action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board may fix in advance the record date. If no record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the day on which the board adopts the resolution relating to such action, or the 60th day prior to the date of such action, whichever is later, are entitled to such rights.

A record date fixed under this section shall not be more than 70 days before the meeting or action for which a determination of members is required.

A determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a membership meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board fixes a new date for determining the right to notice or the right to vote, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date for notice or voting continues in effect or it may fix a new record date for notice or voting.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

§ 55A-7-08.
Member action by written ballot or electronic voting without a meeting.

Unless prohibited or limited by the articles of incorporation or bylaws and without regard to the requirements of

G.S. 55A-7-04

, any action that may be taken at any annual, regular, or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting by written ballots or electronic voting as follows:

Written ballots. — The corporation may deliver a written ballot to members entitled to vote on the matter that sets forth each proposed action and provides an opportunity to vote for or against each proposed action. Unless secret balloting is required on the proposed action, the ballot shall contain or request information sufficient to identify the member or the member’s proxy submitting the ballot. Written ballots may be submitted to the corporation by any reasonable means specified by the corporation, including email.

Electronic voting. — For members who have complied with

G.S. 55A-1-70

, the corporation may provide an electronic ballot or electronic notice that sets forth each proposed action and provides an opportunity and instructions on how to vote for or against each proposed action using the electronic ballot or an electronic voting system.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-162, s. 2(l), effective September 20, 2021.

All members entitled to vote on the matter shall be given the opportunity to vote on the proposed action by written ballot or electronic voting, or both. The board of directors may determine, in its discretion, whether votes shall be cast by written ballots or by electronic voting, or by both, provided that votes may be cast solely by electronic voting only if all members entitled to vote on the proposed action have complied with

G.S. 55A-1-70(b)

. Approval by written ballot or electronic voting, or both, pursuant to this section shall be valid only when the number of votes cast by written ballot or electronic voting, or both, equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the same total number of votes were cast.

All written ballots or solicitations for votes by written ballot, all electronic ballots or solicitations for votes by electronic ballot, and all electronic voting notices shall indicate the time by which a written or electronic ballot shall be received by the corporation or by which electronic votes shall be cast in order to be counted. The deadline for the return of written ballots and electronic ballots and for the casting of electronic votes on any proposed action shall be identical.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, any written ballot, electronic ballot, or electronic vote that is submitted shall not be revoked.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 35; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2008-37, s. 5; 2021-162, s. 2(l).

North Carolina Commentary

This section enables North Carolina corporations to allow their members to vote on any issue by written ballot, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. Under former G.S. 55A-32(b), the bylaws could provide that elections of directors and officers be conducted by mail.

§ 55A-7-09.
Remote participation in meetings; meetings held solely by remote participation.

Members of any class may participate in any meeting of members by means of remote communication to the extent the board of directors authorizes the participation for that class. Participation as a member by means of remote communication is subject to any guidelines and procedures the board of directors adopts and the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

Members participating by means of remote communication are deemed present and may vote at the meeting if the corporation has implemented reasonable measures to do all of the following:

Verify that each person participating remotely as a member is a member.

Provide the members a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members to the same extent they could participate and vote if present in person, including an opportunity to communicate and to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting, substantially concurrently with the proceedings.

Unless member meetings held solely by means of remote communication are prohibited by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that any meeting of members shall not be held at any place and shall instead be held solely by means of remote communication but only if the corporation implements the measures specified in subsection (b) of this section.

In addition to the information required by

G.S. 55A-7-05

, notice of a meeting held solely by means of remote communication shall include notice that the meeting will be held solely by means of remote communication and sufficient instruction and information on how members may join the meeting remotely.

History.

2021-162, s. 2(m).

§§ 55A-7-10 through 55A-7-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.